Nevada, session 83, SB213.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 200.770 is hereby amended to read as follows:
200.770 “Intimate image”:
1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2, includes,
without limitation [, a] :
(a) A photograph, film, videotape or other recorded image
which depicts:
[(a)] (1) The genitals, anus or fully exposed nipple of the
female breast of another person, including through transparent
clothing; or
[(b)] (2) One or more persons engaged in sexual conduct [.] ; or
(b) A photorealistic image, digital image, computer image or
computer-generated image that a reasonable person would believe
depicts:
(1) The genitals, anus or fully exposed nipple of the female
breast of another identifiable person; or
(2) One or more identifiable persons engaged in sexual
conduct.
2. Does not include an image which would otherwise constitute
an intimate image pursuant to subsection 1, but in which the person
depicted in the image:
(a) Is not clearly identifiable; or
(b) Voluntarily exposed himself or herself in a public or
commercial setting . [; or
(c) Is a public figure.]
Sec. 2. NRS 200.780 is hereby amended to read as follows:
200.780 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, a
person commits the crime of unlawful dissemination of an intimate
image when, with the intent to harass, harm or terrorize another
person, the person [electronically] :
(a) Electronically disseminates or sells an intimate image which
depicts the other person and the other person:
[(a)] (1) Did not give prior consent to the electronic
dissemination or the sale of the intimate image;
[(b)] (2) Had a reasonable expectation that the intimate image
would be kept private and would not be made visible to the public;
and
[(c)] (3) Was at least 18 years of age when the intimate image
was created [.] ; or
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
(b) Knowingly distributes or causes to be distributed an
intimate image described in paragraph (b) of subsection 1 of NRS
200.770 which depicts the other person if:
(1) The intimate image is created in a way that would lead a
reasonable person to believe it is an actual depiction of the other
person; and
(2) The other person did not give prior consent to the
distribution of the image.
2. A person who commits the crime of unlawful dissemination
of an intimate image is guilty of a category D felony and shall be
punished as provided in NRS 193.130.
3. The provisions of this section do not apply to [the
electronic] :
(a) The dissemination or distribution of an intimate image for
the purpose of:
[(a)] (1) A legitimate public interest;
[(b)] (2) Reporting unlawful conduct;
[(c)] (3) Any lawful law enforcement or correctional activity;
[(d)] (4) Investigation or prosecution of a violation of this
section; or
[(e)] (5) Preparation for or use in any legal proceeding.
(b) A person who is less than 18 years of age.
4. A person who commits the crime of unlawful dissemination
of an intimate image is not considered a sex offender and is not
subject to registration or community notification as a sex offender
pursuant to NRS 179D.010 to 179D.550, inclusive.
Secs. 3 and 4. (Deleted by amendment.)
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)